dictsource/hi_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Updated file. up to 20 Jan 2015
// letter groups:
// A   vowel letters and vowel signs
// B   vowel signs and virama ्
// C   consonants
// Y   vowel letters and vowel signs

// conditional rules
// ?2   use diphthong for "ai"
// ?3   use diphthong for "au"


// Schwa kept or dropped: corrections learned from WikiPron on top of the
// phoneme table's own schwa deletion (कहना kəhnaː, बहरापन bəɦɾaːpən).
// The rule lines marked "// generated" in each consonant group are not
// hand-written: android/tools/schwa learns them (rule induction on 80% of
// the words) and writes them here. On the 20% it never saw, inherent vowels
// kept or dropped right went from 85.2% to 91.7% (280 fixed, 34 broken).
// Regenerate them with those tools rather than editing by hand.
// L20 = written vowels (signs, and independent vowels except अ);
// L21 = consonant letters; L22 = any Devanagari letter; L23 = ं ँ.
.L20 ा ि ी ु ू ृ ॄ ॅ ॆ े ै ॉ ॊ ो ौ आ इ ई उ ऊ ऋ ऌ ऍ ऎ ए ऐ ऑ ऒ ओ औ ॠ ॡ ॢ ॣ
.L21 क ख ग घ ङ च छ ज झ ञ ट ठ ड ढ ण त थ द ध न ऩ प फ ब भ म य र ऱ ल ळ ऴ व श ष स ह क़ ख़ ग़ ज़ ड़ ढ़ फ़ य़
.L22 ऄ अ आ इ ई उ ऊ ऋ ऌ ऍ ऎ ए ऐ ऑ ऒ ओ औ क ख ग घ ङ च छ ज झ ञ ट ठ ड ढ ण त थ द ध न ऩ प फ ब भ म य र ऱ ल ळ ऴ व श ष स ह ़ ऽ ा ि ी ु ू ृ ॄ ॅ ॆ े ै ॉ ॊ ो ौ ् क़ ख़ ग़ ज़ ड़ ढ़ फ़ य़ ॠ ॡ ॢ ॣ ं ँ ः
.L23 ं ँ

.replace
 ०	0
 १	1
 २	2
 ३	3
 ४	4
 ५	5
 ६	6
 ७	7
 ८	8
 ९	9

// combine nukta-dot consonants into a single character
क़	क़
ख़	ख़
ग़	ग़
ज़	ज़
ड़	ड़
ढ़	ढ़
फ़	फ़
य़	य़	

// Vowels

.L01 क ख ग घ च छ ज झ ट ठ ड ढ त थ द ध प फ ब भ   // stops

.group अ
        अ          V
        अँ         V~        // + candrabindu
        अ (ह       E         //  (h
    अह) अ          E

.group आ
        आ          a:
        आं          a~
        आँ          a~        // + candrabindu

.group इ
        इ          I
        इ (_       ,i:      // final short i lengthens in Hindi; secondary stress
                             // (not primary) needed so ph_hindi_base's i: phoneme
                             // doesn't self-demote back to plain i when this
                             // syllable isn't the word's own stressed one - see
                             // that phoneme's own isUnstressed guard
        इँ        i~        // + candrabindu
        इं        i~
        इ (ंL01    I         // इंतज़ार

.group ई
        ई          i:
        ई (_       ,i:      // final -i is always long in Hindi; was plain "i"
                             // (word-final SHORTENING, backwards) before this -
                             // see .group इ above for why the stress mark matters
        ईँ         i~        // + candrabindu

.group उ
        उ          U
        उ (_       u:       // final short u lengthens; no stress mark needed here -
                             // unlike i:, ph_hindi_base's u: has no isUnstressed
                             // self-demotion guard (confirmed by trace: injecting
                             // unstressed u: keeps its own distinct duration)
        उँ         U~        // + candrabindu

.group ऊ
        ऊ          u
        ऊं          u~        // + anusvara
        ऊँ         u~        // + candrabindu

.group ऋ
        ऋ          rI

.group ऌ
        ऌ          l-        // vocalic l

.group ऍ
        ऍ          E         // candra e

.group ऎ
        ऎ          e
        ऎं          e~
        ऎँ         e~

.group ए
        ए          e:
        एँ          e~:
        एं          e~:
    ा) एँ (_       j

.group ऐ
        ऐ          E:        // ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]
        ऐं          E~
        ऐँ         E~
?2      ऐ          aI        // ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]


.group ऑ
        ऑ          O         // candra O

.group ऒ
        ऒ          o
        ऒं          o~
        ऒँ         o~

.group ओ
        ओ          o:
        ओं          o~        // +anusvara
        ओँ         o~        // +candrabindu
    ा) ओं (_       w        // +anusvara
    ा) ओँ (_       w
    

.group औ
        औ          O:        // ?? [aU] [O:]
        औं          O~        // +anusvara
        औँ         O~        // +candrabindu
?3      औ          aU        // ?? [aU] [O:]


// Vowel Signs

.group ा
ा	#X2a:
   C) ा      a:
C)        ा (ँ       a~
C)        ाँ (_      a~
C)        ां         a~


.group ि
ि	#X1I
C)        ि          I
C)        ि (_       ,i:      // final short i lengthens (shakti, vidhi); see
                              // .group इ above for why the stress mark matters
C)        ि (ँ       I~        // like the other vowel signs: nasalize here, ँ adds nothing
C)        िं       i~
C)        ि (ंL01   I         // before a stop ं is a nasal consonant: हिंदुस्तानी, सिंचित

.group ी
ी	#X2i:
C)        ी          i:
C)        ी (_       ,i:      // final -i is always long in Hindi; secondary stress
                             // needed - see .group इ above for why
C)        ी (ँ       i~
C)        ीँ (_      i~
C)        ीं         i~

.group ु
ु	#X1U
C)        ु          U
C)        ु (_       u:       // final short u lengthens; see .group उ for why no
                              // stress mark is needed (u: has no self-demotion)
C)        ु (ँ       u~
C)        ुं         u~
C)        ु (ंL01    U         // कुंडली, मुंगौरा
C)        ुँ (_      u~

.group ू
ू	#X2u:
C)        ू          u:
C)        ू (ँ       u~
C)        ूं         u~        // or O~   ??
C)        ूँ (_      u~

.group ृ
ृ	#X1rI
C)        ृ          rI

.group ॄ
ॄ	#X1rI
C)        ॄ          rI

.group ॅ
ॅ	#X1E
C)        ॅ          E

.group ॆ
ॆ	#X1e
C)        ॆ          e
C)        ॆ (ँ       e~
C)        ॆं         e~
C)        ॆँ (_      e~

.group े
े	#X2e:
C)        े          e:
C)        े (ँ       e~
C)        ें         e~:
C)        ेँ (_      e~:

.group ै
ै	#X2E:
C)        ै          E:        // ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]
C)        ैं         E~ 
C)        ै (ँ       E~ 
C)        ैं         E~
C)        ैँ (_      E~
?2 ै	#X2aI
?2  C)    ै          aI        // ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]

.group ॉ
ॉ	#X1O
C)        ॉ          O

.group ॊ
ॊ	#X1o
C)        ॊ          o
C)        ॊ (ँ       o~
C)        ॊं         o~
C)        ॊँ (_      o~

.group ो
ो	#X2o:
C)        ो          o:
C)        ो (ँ       o~
C)        ों         o~
C)        ोँ (_      o~

.group ौ
ौ	#X2O:
C)        ौ          O:        //  [O:] or [aU] ??
C)        ौ (ँ       O~        //  [O:] or [aU] ??
C)        ौं         O~
C)        ौँ (_      O~
?3 ौ 	#X2aU
?3  C)    ौ          aU        //  [O:] or [aU] ??

.group ॢ     // vowel sign l
ॢ 	#X1l-
C)        ॢ          l-

.group ॣ    // vowel sign ll
ॣ	#X2l-:
C)        ॣ          l-:

.group ॐ
ॐ	o~m


// Consonants

.group क
        क          kV
        _L23) क (L21L20_         k        // generated
        _L23) क (L21L20          k        // generated
        _L22L23) क (L21L20_      k        // generated
        _L22L23) क (L21L20       k        // generated
        L23) क (L21L20_          k        // generated
        L23) क (L21L20           k        // generated
        _L22) क (L21्_           k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L21्            k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L21्_        k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L21्         k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L21्_            k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L21्             k@4      // generated
        _L20) क (L21L22्         k        // generated
        _L22L20) क (L21L22्      k        // generated
        L20) क (L21L22्          k        // generated
        _L22) क (L21L21_         k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L21L21          k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L21L21_      k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L21L21       k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L21L21_          k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L21L21           k@4      // generated
        _्) क (L21_              k@4      // generated
        _्) क (L21L22_           k@4      // generated
        _्) क (L21               k@4      // generated
        _L22्) क (L21_           k@4      // generated
        _L22्) क (L21L22_        k@4      // generated
        _L22्) क (L21            k@4      // generated
        ्) क (L21_               k@4      // generated
        ्) क (L21L22_            k@4      // generated
        ्) क (L21                k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L23_            k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L23L22_         k@4      // generated
        _L22) क (L23             k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L23_         k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L23L22_      k@4      // generated
        _L22L22) क (L23          k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L23_             k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L23L22_          k@4      // generated
        L22) क (L23              k@4      // generated
        _L21) क (L21L22ड         k        // generated
        _ां) क (L21_             k@4      // generated
        _ां) क (L21L22_          k@4      // generated
        _ां) क (L21              k@4      // generated
        ां) क (L21_              k@4      // generated
        ां) क (L21L22_           k@4      // generated
        ां) क (L21               k@4      // generated
        _L21) क (L21L22्         k        // generated
        _L22L21) क (L21L22्      k        // generated
        L21) क (L21L22्          k        // generated
        _L20) क (L21L23_         k        // generated
        _L20) क (L21L23          k        // generated
        _L22L20) क (L21L23_      k        // generated
        _L22L20) क (L21L23       k        // generated
        L20) क (L21L23_          k        // generated
        L20) क (L21L23           k        // generated
        _L22) क (पL22_           k        // generated
        _L22) क (पL22            k        // generated
        _L21) क (L21L23_         k        // generated
        _L21) क (L21L23          k        // generated
        _L22L21) क (L21L23_      k        // generated
        _L22L21) क (L21L23       k        // generated
        L21) क (L21L23_          k        // generated
        L21) क (L21L23           k        // generated
        _L20) क (L21L22्         k        // generated
        _L22L20) क (L21L22्      k        // generated
        L20) क (L21L22्          k        // generated
        कँ         kV~        // + candrabindu
        क (_       k
        क (B       k
     @) कर (_S2    k@2r       // -kar suffix (उठकर "having got up"): strip it and
                              // translate the stem alone, so schwa deletion sees the
                              // boundary - otherwise उठकर came out [ʊʈʰəkər]
        क (्य      k:
        क़         qV
        क़ (_      q
        क़ (B      q
